Vermont, session 2025-2026, H405.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4817 is amended to read:
§ 4817. COMPETENCY TO STAND TRIAL; DETERMINATION;
DISMISSAL
* * *
(b) A person shall not be tried for a criminal offense if the person is found
incompetent to stand trial by a preponderance of the evidence.
* * *
(d) A person who has been found incompetent to stand trial for an alleged
offense may be tried for that offense if, upon subsequent hearing, such person
VT LEG #380760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.405
2025 Page 2 of 2
is found by the court having jurisdiction of the person’s trial for the offense to
have become competent to stand trial.
(e) When a person has been found incompetent to stand trial for an alleged
offense, the charges against the person shall be dismissed if the person has not
regained competency prior to the expiration of the statute of limitations for the
offense under chapter 151 of this title. Dismissal of charges against a person
pursuant to this subsection shall not affect whether the person may be tried for
the offense after becoming competent as provided for in subsection (d) of this
section.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 4509 is added to read:
§ 4509. EFFECT OF FINDING OF INCOMPETENCY TO STAND TRIAL
The applicable limitations period for an offense shall resume running when
a person is found incompetent to stand trial for the offense pursuant to section
4817 of this title. If the person is subsequently found competent to stand trial
for the offense, the limitations period shall be tolled upon the date of the
finding.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380760 v.1